Massachusetts, session 194th, H3618.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 64. (a) As used in this section the following terms shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“School zone”, on or within 50 feet of the real property comprising a public or private
accredited preschool, accredited Head Start facility, elementary, vocational or secondary school.
“Small unmanned aircraft”, an unmanned aircraft weighing less than 55 pounds on
takeoff, including everything that is on board or otherwise attached to the aircraft.
of 2

“Small unmanned aircraft system”, a small unmanned aircraft and its associated
elements, including communication links and the components that control the small unmanned
aircraft, that are required for the safe and efficient operation of the small unmanned aircraft.
“Unmanned aircraft”, an aircraft operated without the possibility of direct human
intervention from within or on the aircraft.
(b) No person shall operate a small unmanned aircraft system within a vertical distance of
400 feet in a school zone without authorization by the superintendent of schools.
(c) Whoever willfully operates a small unmanned aircraft system in violation of
subsection (b) shall be punished by a fine of not more than $250 for the first offense, a fine of
not more than $500 for a second offense, and a fine of not more than $750 and the small
unmanned aircraft system shall be confiscated by the commonwealth and destroyed for a third or
subsequent offense.
of 2